Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 3. Sergeant at Arms

§ 61.
Election.

A Sergeant at Arms shall be elected biennially by the Senate and House of Representatives in joint assembly.

§ 62.
Legislative duties.

The Sergeant at Arms shall:

execute orders of either house, the Joint Legislative Management Committee, the Committee on Joint Rules, or the House or Senate Committee on Rules;

maintain order among spectators and take measures to prevent interruption of either house or any committee thereof;

arrange for special meetings and conferences at the State House;

provide for the distribution of mail to all legislators;

schedule the time for the use of rooms for committee meetings and hearings;

maintain in a good state of repair and provide security for all furniture, draperies, rugs, desks, and other furnishings kept in the State House;

provide for the establishment of a cafeteria and supervise its operation;

perform such other duties for the benefit of the legislators as may be required by any duly authorized committee thereof.

He or she or any person in his or her employ shall not accept any compensation or gift for his or her services other than his or her salary. If he or she or any person in his or her employ violates this provision, he or she shall be fined $25.00.

The Sergeant at Arms shall not be responsible for structural repairs, capital improvements, or building maintenance for the State House (as the term maintenance is defined in

29 V.S.A. § 159

) or for the use, upkeep, or maintenance of the State House grounds.

The Sergeant at Arms and employees of the Sergeant at Arms shall seek guidance from and operate in accordance with policies adopted by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 231

, § 1, eff. July 25, 1961;

1971, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 3, 1972;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 45, eff. May 24, 2000;

2017, No. 84

, § 24, eff. June 16, 2017;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 63.
Repealed. 2019 No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 64.
Employment of assistants; Capitol Police.

The Sergeant at Arms may employ assistants, custodians, doorkeepers, guides, messengers, mail and room assignment clerks, security personnel, pages, and other staff as needed to carry out the Sergeant at Arms’ duties, except that requests for new, permanent positions shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Legislative Management Committee. The Sergeant at Arms shall also appoint Capitol Police officers as set forth in section 70 of this chapter.

All individuals employed by the Sergeant at Arms shall be subject to the personnel policies adopted by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

The provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 13 (classification of State personnel) shall not apply to employees of the Sergeant at Arms unless this exception is partially or wholly waived by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. March 1, 1961; amended

1971, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 3, 1972;

1975, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1977, No. 109

, § 26, eff. July 3, 1977;

1979, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a;

1995, No. 13

, § 1;

1997, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

1999, No. 29

, § 47, eff. May 19, 1999;

2011, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§§ 65,
66.
Repealed. 1999, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. May 24, 2000.

§ 67.
Deputy Sergeant at Arms.

The chief doorkeeper of the House of Representatives shall be ex officio Deputy Sergeant at Arms.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 68.
Budget.

The Sergeant at Arms shall propose a budget for the Office of Sergeant at Arms to the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 70.
Capitol Police Department.

Creation. The Capitol Police Department is created within the Office of the Sergeant at Arms. The Sergeant at Arms shall appoint and may remove, at his or her pleasure, individuals as Capitol Police officers, one of whom shall be appointed to serve as Chief. All such positions shall be exempt State employees. The Chief shall supervise the officer force under the direction of the Sergeant at Arms. Such appointments and all oaths or affirmations shall be in writing and filed with the Sergeant at Arms. An officer shall also serve as a Deputy Sergeant at Arms and as a notary public pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 442

.

Powers; training.

A Capitol Police officer shall have all the same powers and authority as sheriffs and other law enforcement officers anywhere in the State, which shall include the authority to arrest persons and enforce the civil and criminal laws, keep the peace, provide security, and serve civil and criminal process. For this purpose, a Capitol Police officer shall subscribe to the same oaths required for sheriffs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a Capitol Police officer shall be a Level II or Level III law enforcement officer certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to the provisions of 20 V.S.A. chapter 151, except that the Chief of the Capitol Police shall be a Level III certified law enforcement officer.

Coordination of Capitol Complex security. The Capitol Police Department shall provide security within the State House and assist the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services in providing security and law enforcement services within the Capitol Complex, pursuant to the memorandum of understanding required by

29 V.S.A. § 171(f)

.

Training; equipment. At State expense and with the approval of the Sergeant at Arms, Capitol Police officers shall be provided with training and furnished uniforms and equipment necessary in the performance of their duties, and such items shall remain the property of the State.

Strategic plan. The Sergeant at Arms, in consultation with the Chief, shall prepare, maintain, and update, at least biennially, a strategic plan for the Capitol Police Department, which shall be subject to review and approval by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 29

, § 46, eff. May 19, 1999; amended

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. May 24, 2000;

2011, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. July 1, 2015;

2015, No. 2

, § 1, eff. March 12, 2015;

2015, No. 2

, § 2;

2015, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 6, 2016;

2017, No. 87

(Adj. Sess.), § 56, eff. Feb. 13, 2018;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 71.
Redesignated. 2019, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 11(a).